Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 14. Mississippi Uniform Limited Partnership Act

Provisions relating to limited partnerships were previously codified in former Chapter 13, entitled “Limited Partnerships,” which was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 488, § 1105 (codified as
§ 79-14-1105), effective from and after January 1, 1988. Former Chapter 13 contained the following undesignated headings:

“Mississippi Uniform Limited Partnership Law” [Codes, 1942, §§ 5553-01 through 5553-29; Laws, 1964, ch. 271, §§ 1 through 29], comprising former
§§ 79-13-1 through
79-13-57;

“Limited Partnerships Under Prior Laws” [Codes, Hutchinson's 1848, ch. 40, art 1; 1857, ch. 38, art. 1 et seq; 1871, §§ 1857-1877; 1880, §§ 1005-1024; 1892, §§ 2764-2781; 1906, §§ 3129-3146; Hemingway's 1917, §§ 5467-5484; 1930, §§ 5394-5411; 1942, §§ 5553-5570; Laws, 1942, ch. 320; Laws, 1944, ch. 310, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 510, §§ 1 through 3], comprising former
§§ 79-13-101 through
79-13-137; and

“Foreign Limited Partnerships” [Laws, 1979, ch. 420, §§ 2 through 10], comprising former
§§ 79-13-201 through
79-13-217.

The Mississippi Limited Partnership Act [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, §§ 101 through 1107] comprising former §§ 79-14-101 through 79-14-1107, was repealed by Section 6 of Chapter 453, Laws of 2015, effective July 1, 2015, and replaced by the Mississippi Uniform Limited Partnership Act, codified as §§ 79-14-101 through 79-14-1301 by Section 1 of Chapter 453, Laws of 2015, effective from and after July 1, 2015.